California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) For over a decade, the state’s commitment to parks and natural resources has dwindled. California has not kept pace with the needed funding to adequately manage and maintain its multibillion dollar investment in neighborhood, urban, and state parks and natural areas resulting in disrepair and overcrowding of many park facilities and the degradation of wild lands.

(d) The magnificent Pacific Coast, outstanding mountain ranges, and unique scenic regions are the source of tremendous economic opportunity and contribute enormously to the quality of life of Californians.

(e) Continued economic success and enjoyment derived from
 California’s natural resources depends on maintaining clean water, healthy ecosystems, and expanding public access for a growing state.

(f) The backlog of needs for repair and maintenance of local and urban parks exceeds two billion five hundred million dollars and the need for maintenance of state parks exceeds one billion dollars. The state’s conservancies and wildlife agencies report a need for habitat acquisition and restoration exceeding $1.8 billion.

(g) This act will begin to address these critical neighborhood park and natural resources needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.303.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Air pollution continues to be a major problem in California which harms the health of our residents, costs our economy billions of dollars related to health care costs, reduced agricultural productivity, and damage to our infrastructure, and otherwise decreases the quality of life in our state.

(b) Forests and trees improve air quality by removing carbon dioxide, particulates, and other pollutants from the air, and by producing oxygen.

(c) Park, open-space, and tree planting projects also improve air quality and decrease congestion by reducing sprawl, improving the quality of life in areas that are already developed by helping local agencies implement sound land use plans that promote energy efficiency, and by providing incentives to reduce development in inappropriate areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.306.

It is the intent of the Legislature to strongly encourage every state or local government agency receiving the bond funds allocated pursuant to this chapter for an activity to give full and proper consideration to the use of recycled and reusable products whenever possible with regard to carrying out that activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.307.

(a) Every proposed activity to be funded pursuant to this chapter shall be in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(b) Lands acquired with funds allocated pursuant to this chapter shall be acquired from a willing seller of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.3075.

Upon a finding by the administering entity that a particular project for which funds have been allocated cannot be completed, or that the funds are in excess of the total needed, the Legislature may reallocate those funds for other high priority needs consistent with this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.308.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition” means the acquisition from a willing seller of a fee interest or any other interest, including easements and development rights, in real property from a willing seller.

(b) “Board” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency designated in accordance with subdivision (b) of
 Section 5096.362.

(c) “Certified local community conservation corps programs” means programs operated by public or private nonprofit agencies pursuant to Section 14406.

(d) “Committee” means the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Finance Committee created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.362.

(e) “District” means any regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3, any recreation and park district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780), or an authority formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100). With respect to any community or unincorporated region that is not included within a
 district, and in which no city or county provides parks or recreational areas or facilities, “district” also means any other district that is authorized by statute to operate and manage parks or recreational areas or facilities, employs a full-time park and recreation director, offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by the district, and allocates a substantial portion of its annual operating budget to parks or recreation areas or facilities

(f) “Fund” means the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 5096.310.

(g) “Historical resource” includes, but is not limited to, any building, structure, site area, place, artifact, or collection of artifacts that is historically or archaeologically significant in the cultural annals of California.

(h) “Program” means the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Program established pursuant to this chapter.

(i) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(j) (1) “Stewardship” means the development and implementation of projects for the protection, preservation, rehabilitation, restoration, and improvement of natural systems and outstanding features of the state park system and historical and cultural resources. Those efforts may not include activities that merely supplement normal park operations or that are usually funded from other sources.

(2) (A) “Cultural resources stewardship” may include, but is not limited to, stabilization and
 protection of historical resources, including archaeological resources, in the state park system. Those resources may include sites, features, ruins, archaeological deposits, historical landscape resources, rock art features, and artifacts making up the physical legacy of California’s past.

(B) “Cultural resources stewardship” does not include the rehabilitation, restoration, reconstruction, interpretation, or mitigation of historical resources typically required as part of a development program.

(3) “Natural resources stewardship” may include, but is not limited to, such objectives as the control of major erosion and geologic hazards, the restoration and improvement of critical plant and animal habitat, the control and elimination of exotic species encroachment, the stabilization of coastal dunes and bluffs, and the planning necessary to implement those objectives.

(k) “Wildlife conservation partnership” means a cooperative acquisition, restoration, or management of wildlife habitat for which the Wildlife Conservation Board provides matching funds to leverage other public, private, or nonprofit resources to maximize the conservation benefits to wildlife and wildlife habitat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.309.

Pursuant to guidelines issued by the secretary, all recipients of funding pursuant to this chapter shall post signs acknowledging the source of the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Program [5096.310. - 5096.310.]

5096.310.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Bond Fund, which is hereby created. Unless otherwise specified and except as provided in subdivision (m), the money in the fund shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature, in the manner set forth in this chapter, only for
 parks and resources improvement, in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of five hundred two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($502,750,000) to the department for the following purposes:

(1) To rehabilitate, restore, and improve units of the state park system that will ensure that state park system lands and facilities will remain open and accessible for public use.

(2) To develop, improve, rehabilitate, restore, enhance, and protect facilities and trails at existing units of the state park system that will provide for optimal recreational and educational use, activities, improved access and safety, and the acquisition from a willing seller of inholdings and adjacent lands. Adjacent lands are lands contiguous to, or in the immediate vicinity of, existing state park system lands and that
 directly benefit an existing state park system unit.

(3) For stewardship of the public investment in the preservation of the critical natural heritage and scenic features, and cultural heritage stewardship projects that will preserve vanishing remnants of California’s landscape, and protect and promote a greater understanding of California’s past, and the planning necessary to implement those efforts.

(4) For facilities and improvements to enhance volunteer participation in the state park system.

(5) To develop, improve, and expand interpretive facilities at units of the state park system, including educational exhibits and visitor orientation centers.

(6) To rehabilitate and repair aging facilities at winter recreation facilities pursuant to the
 Sno-Park program, as provided for in Chapter 1.27 (commencing with Section 5091.01), that provide for improved public safety.

(7) For projects that improve air quality related to the state park system, including, but not limited to, the purchase of low-emission or advanced technology vehicles and equipment and clean fuel distribution facilities that will avoid or reduce air emissions at state park facilities.

(b) The sum of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) to the department to undertake stewardship projects, including cultural resources stewardship and natural resources stewardship projects, that will restore and protect the natural treasures of the state park system, preserve vanishing remnants of California’s landscape, and protect and promote a greater understanding of California’s past.

(c) The sum of four
 million dollars ($4,000,000) to the department for facilities and improvements to enhance volunteer participation in the state park system.

(d) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to the department for grants to local agencies administering units of the state park system under an operating agreement with the department, for the development, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, protection, and interpretation of lands and facilities of, and improved access to, those locally operated units.

(e) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the department for purposes consistent with Section 5079.10, for competitive grants, in accordance with Section 5096.335.

(f) The sum of three hundred eighty-eight million dollars ($388,000,000) to the department for grants, in accordance with Sections
 5096.332, 5096.333, and 5096.336, on the basis of population, for the acquisition, development, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, and interpretation of local park and recreational lands and facilities, including renovation of recreational facilities conveyed to local agencies resulting from the downsizing or decommissioning of federal military installations.

(g) The sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) to the department for grants to cities, counties, and districts for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, and restoration of park and recreation areas and facilities pursuant to the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreational Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620)).

(h) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the department for grants, in accordance with Section 5096.337, for the improvement or
 acquisition and restoration of riparian habitat, riverine aquatic habitat, and other lands in close proximity to rivers and streams for river and stream trail projects undertaken in accordance with Section 78682.2 of the Water Code, and for purposes of Section 7048 of the Water Code.

(i) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the department for grants, in accordance with Section 5096.337, for the development, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, and interpretation of nonmotorized trails for the purpose of increasing public access to, and enjoyment of, public areas for increased recreational opportunities. Not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) of this amount shall be allocated toward the completion of a project that links existing bicycle and pedestrian trail systems to major urban public transportation systems, to promote increased recreational opportunities and nonmotorized commuter
 usage in the City of Whittier. Of this amount, no less than two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000) shall be allocated to the East Bay Regional Park District toward the completion of the Iron Horse Trail. Of this amount, not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to a regional park district for the completion of a bike trial in the City of Concord.

(j) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) to the department for grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for park, youth center, and environmental enhancement projects that benefit youth in areas that lack safe neighborhood parks, open space, and natural areas, and that have significant poverty.

(k) The sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) to the California Conservation Corps to complete capital outlay and resource conservation projects and
 administrative costs allocable to the bond funded projects.

(l) The sum of eighty-six million five hundred thousand dollars ($86,500,000) to the department for the following purposes:

(1) The sum of seventy-one million five hundred thousand dollars ($71,500,000) for grants, in accordance with Sections 5096.339 and 5096.340, for urban recreational and cultural centers, including, but not limited to, zoos, museums, aquariums, and facilities for wildlife, environmental, or natural science aquatic education or projects that combine curation of archaeological, paleontological, and historic resources with education and basic and applied research, and that emphasize specimens of California’s extinct prehistoric plants and animals.

(2) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for grants for regional youth
 soccer and baseball facilities operated by nonprofit organizations. Priority shall be given to those grant projects that utilize existing school facilities or recreation facilities and serve disadvantaged youth.

(m) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of two hundred sixty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($265,500,000) is, except as provided in Section 5096.350, hereby continuously appropriated to the Wildlife Conservation Board, without regard to fiscal years, in accordance with Section 5096.350.

(n) The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to the California Tahoe Conservancy, in accordance with Section 5096.351.

(o) The sum of two hundred twenty million four hundred thousand dollars ($220,400,000) to the State Coastal Conservancy, in accordance with Section 5096.352.

(p) The sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, in accordance with Section 5096.353.

(q) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, in accordance with Section 5096.354.

(r) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to the San Joaquin River Conservancy, in accordance with Section 5096.355.

(s) The sum of twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) to the California Conservation Corps for grants for the certified local community conservation corps program to complete capital outlay and resource conservation projects.

(t) The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000)
 to the Department of Conservation in accordance with Section 5096.356.

(u) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for urban forestry programs in accordance with Section 4799.12. The grants made pursuant to this subdivision shall be for costs associated with the purchase and planting of trees, and up to three years of care which ensures the long-term viability of those trees.

(v) Notwithstanding Section 711 of the Fish and Game Code, the sum of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) to the Department of Fish and Game for the following purposes:

(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for expenditure in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 5096.357.

(2) The sum of five million dollars
 ($5,000,000) for expenditure in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 5096.357.

(3) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to remove nonnative vegetation harmful to ecological reserves in San Diego County.

(w) The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available for purposes of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160) of Division 21. Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be allocated to Mount Diablo State Park.

(x) The sum of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to the California Integrated Waste Management Board for grants to local agencies to assist them in meeting state and federal accessibility standards relating to public playgrounds if the local agency guarantees that 50 percent of the grant funds will be used for the improvement or replacement of playground equipment or
 facilities through the use of recycled materials and that matching funds in an amount equal to not less than 50 percent of the total amount of those grant funds will be provided through either public or private funds or in-kind contributions. The board may reduce this matching fund requirement to not less than 25 percent if it determines that the 50-percent requirement would impose an extreme financial hardship on the local agency applying for the grant. The board may expend the funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes specified herein.

(y) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to a city for rehabilitation, restoration, or enhancement to a city park that is over 1,000 acres that serves an urban area of over 750,000 population in northern California and that provides recreational, cultural, and scientific resources.

(z) (1) The sum of six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($6,250,000) to the secretary to administer grants to the Sierra Nevada-Cascade Program, in accordance with Section 5096.347.

(2) The sum of thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000) to the secretary to administer a river parkway and restoration program to assist local agencies and other districts to plan, create, and conserve river parkways. The secretary shall make funds available in accordance with Sections 7048 and 78682.2 of the Water Code, and any other applicable authority, for the following purposes:

(A) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for the acquisition or restoration of public lands within the Los Angeles River Watershed, the San Gabriel River Watershed, and the San Gabriel Mountains and to provide open space, nonmotorized trails, bike
 paths, and other low-impact recreational uses and wildlife and habitat restoration and protection. Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated for the Los Angeles River Watershed, and fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be allocated for the San Gabriel River Watershed and the San Gabriel Mountains and lower Los Angeles River.

(B) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for river parkway projects along the Kern River between the mouth of the Kern Canyon and I-5.

(C) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for land acquisition in the Santa Clarita Watershed.

(D) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for watershed, riparian, and wetlands restoration along the Sacramento River in Yolo, Glenn, and Colusa Counties.

(E) Two million
 dollars ($2,000,000) for the construction of a visitor center at a state recreation area encompassing a body of water along the American River.

(3) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the secretary for resource conservation and urban water recycling that addresses multicounty regional recreational needs, provides habitat restoration, and enjoys joint sponsorship by multiple local agencies and nonprofit organizations in the County of Sonoma.

(4) The sum of one million one hundred thousand dollars ($1,100,000) to the secretary, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of which shall be made available to fund a community center in San Benito County, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of which shall be made available to fund a veterans park in San Benito County, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of which shall be made available to fund a community center in the
 City of Galt, and four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) of which shall be made available to fund a community center in the City of Gilroy.

(5) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the secretary for Camp Arroyo in Alameda County.

(6) The sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) to the secretary to construct a rehabilitation center for injured endangered and indigenous wild animals at the Wildhaven Center in the San Bernardino Mountains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Park System Program [5096.320. - 5096.324.]

5096.320.

The Legislature hereby recognizes that public financial resources are inadequate to meet all capital outlay needs of the state park system and that the need for the acquisition, development, restoration, rehabilitation, improvement, and protection of state park system lands and facilities has increased to the point that their continued well-being and the realization of their full public benefit is in jeopardy.

Projects approved by the secretary shall be forwarded by the secretary to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 143.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, and approved in Prop. 12 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.322.

(a) No later than November 1, 2001, the director shall determine the amount of funding that is necessary to complete all deferred maintenance projects within each unit of the state park system.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no proceeds of the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be used to acquire improved property for a unit of the state park system until 75 percent of the amount
 determined pursuant to subdivision (a) has been appropriated, and allocated to complete deferred maintenance projects within that unit from an appropriated funding source other than the proceeds of the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Real property may be acquired under this chapter for a unit of the state park system that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (b) only if the director finds, with respect to that unit, that a unique opportunity is presented to acquire real property that will constitute a significant improvement of the state park system.

(d) As used in this section, “deferred maintenance project” means any project identified in the department’s 2001 Deferred Maintenance Assessment that rehabilitates or repairs a facility to a safe and usable condition for the visiting public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.323.

Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) of the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.310 shall be expended for the acquisition of land from willing sellers that are a high priority for both the state parks system and for habitat purposes, with priority given to projects that protect habitat for rare, threatened, or endangered species pursuant to a natural community conservation plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 10 of the Fish and Game
 Code, if the acquisition of the land is conducted in conjunction with a natural community conservation plan approved by the Department of Fish and Game prior to January 1, 1999, or if the acquisition is approved by statute. Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.310, those land acquisitions may be for either new or existing units of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.324.

Funds appropriated to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.310 shall be made available for the following purposes:

(a) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to preserve and restore a unit of the state parks system that preserves and restores cultural and historical immigration resources in northern California.

(b) The sum of two million six hundred thousand dollars ($2,600,000) to construct visitor centers in state parks, state recreation areas, and state historic parks. The department shall give priority to projects at Chino Hills State Park and California Citrus State Historic Park.

(c) Up to six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000) for playground equipment upgrades in state recreation areas.

(d) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for restoration of state reserves that maintain the state flower.

(e) The sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for restoration of state beaches.

(f) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for restoration, study, and curation of
 paleontological, archaeological, and historical resource site protection. Priority shall be given to projects that combine curation of archaeological, paleontological, and historical resources with education and basic and applied research, and that emphasize specimens of California’s extinct prehistoric plants and animals.

(g) The sum of two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,750,000), two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) of which shall be allocated for capital outlay projects at the Empire Mine State Historic Park, and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of which shall be allocated for Columbia State Historic Park.

(h) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for the acquisition of lands from willing sellers of lands that are forested with redwoods or that will enhance the protection or preservation of the redwood forest ecosystem.
 The department shall give preference to projects where matching contributions in funding from other public agencies, private parties, or nonprofit organizations are available.

(i) Up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to construct trails, trailheads, and parking, and to provide nonvehicular public access between the Bear and Mendoza Ranch open space and adjacent Henry Coe State Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Grant Program [5096.331. - 5096.345.]

5096.331.

The Legislature hereby recognizes that public financial resources are inadequate to meet all of the funding needs of local public park and recreation providers and that there is an urgent need for safe, open, and accessible local park and recreational facilities and for the increased recreational opportunities that provide positive alternatives to social problems. Accordingly, it is declared to be the policy of this state that the funds allocated pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section
 5096.310 to local agencies shall be appropriated primarily for projects that accomplish all of the following:

(a) Rehabilitate facilities at existing local parks that will provide for more efficient management and reduced operational costs. This may include grants to local agencies for the renovation of recreational facilities conveyed to local agencies resulting from the downsizing and decommissioning of federal military installations.

(b) Develop facilities that promote positive alternatives for youth and that promote cooperation between local park and recreation service providers and youth-serving nonprofit organizations.

(c) Promote family oriented recreation, including art activities.

(d) Provide for open, safe, and accessible local park lands,
 facilities, and botanical gardens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.332.

(a) Sixty percent of the total funds available for grants pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.310 shall be allocated to cities and to districts other than a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district. Each city’s and district’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the city’s or district’s population is to the combined total of the state’s population that is included in incorporated areas and unincorporated areas
 within the district, except that each city or district shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000). In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of such a district, the population in the area of overlapping jurisdictions shall be attributed to each jurisdiction in proportion to the extent to which each operates and manages parks and recreational areas and facilities for that population. In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of such a district, and in the area of overlap the city does not operate and manage parks and recreational areas and facilities, all grant funds shall be allocated to the district.

(b) Each city and each district subject to subdivision (a) whose boundaries overlap shall develop a specific plan for allocating the grant funds in accordance with the formula specified in subdivision (a). If, by April 1, 2001, the plan has not been agreed
 to by the city and district and submitted to the department, the director shall determine the allocation of the grant funds among the affected jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.333.

(a) Forty percent of the total funds available for grants pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.310 shall be allocated to counties and regional park districts, regional park and open-space districts, or regional open-space districts formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3.

(b) Each county’s allocation under subdivision (a) shall be in the same ratio as the county’s
 population, except that each county shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(c) In any county that embraces all or part of the territory of a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district, whose board of directors is not the county board of supervisors, the amount allocated to the county shall be apportioned between that district and the county in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the district and the population of the county that is outside the territory of the district.

(d) In any county that currently embraces all or a part of the territory of a regional open-space district and an authority formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100), the allocation shall be distributed between the county and these entities as
 follows:

(1) First, the funds shall be apportioned between the district and the county in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the district, and the proportion of the population of the county that is outside the district. The amounts resulting from this calculation shall be known as the district’s share, and the county’s first balance. The district’s share shall be allocated to the district. The county’s first balance shall be further apportioned as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) The county’s first balance, as determined in accordance with paragraph (1), shall be further apportioned between the authority and the county in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the authority, and the proportion of the population of the county that is outside the authority. The amounts resulting from this
 calculation shall be known as the authority’s share, and the county’s second balance.

(3) The authority’s share shall be divided equally between the county and the authority. The county shall receive all of the county’s second balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.334.

Notwithstanding Section 5096.331, of the funds allocated on the basis of population pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.310 within counties with a population of five million persons or more, not less than 75 percent of the total amount shall be available as follows:

(a) Not less than 20 percent for land acquisition, construction, development, and rehabilitation of at-risk youth recreation facilities. As used in this section,
 “at-risk youth” means persons who have not attained the age of 21 years and are at high risk of being involved in, or are involved in, one or more of the following: gangs, juvenile delinquency, criminal activity, substance abuse, adolescent pregnancy, or school failure or dropout.

(b) Not less than 40 percent for projects within the most economically disadvantaged areas, which may include projects along river parkways, conservation corridors, and parkways along corridors of economic significance.

(c) Not less than 10 percent for urban reforestation projects.

(d) Not more than 5 percent for projects that convert publicly owned land to a neighborhood park providing open-space, recreational, cultural, and festival opportunities, if the bond proceeds do not exceed 25 percent of the total project cost and there is a 75
 percent funding match.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.335.

Funds authorized pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5096.310 shall be administered by the State Office of Historic Preservation and shall be available as grants, on a competitive basis, to cities, counties, districts, local agencies formed for park purposes pursuant to a joint powers agreement between two or more local entities, and nonprofit organizations for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, and interpretation of historical resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.336.

(a) Of the funds authorized pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.310, three hundred thirty-eight million dollars ($338,000,000) shall be available for grants to cities, counties, and districts on the basis of their populations, as determined by the department in cooperation with the Department of Finance, on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data and other population data that the department may require to be furnished by the applicant city, county, or
 district.

(b) Of the funds authorized pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.310, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) available for grants pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5096.310 shall be allocated to cities and districts in urbanized counties providing park and recreation services within jurisdictions of 200,000 or less in population. For purposes of this subdivision, “urbanized counties” means a county with a population of 200,000 or greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.337.

(a) Funds authorized pursuant to subdivisions (h), (i), and (z) of Section 5096.310 shall be available as grants, on a competitive basis, to cities, counties, districts, local agencies formed for park purposes pursuant to a joint powers agreement as defined in subdivision (b), and other districts, as defined in subdivision (c).

(b) For
 purposes of this section, “local agency” means any local agency formed for park purposes pursuant to a joint powers agreement between two or more local entities, excluding school districts.

(c) For purposes of this section, “other districts” include any district authorized to provide park, recreational, or open-space services, or a combination of those services, except a school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.338.

The funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 5096.310 shall, upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act, be available for existing or new entities or programs designated by statute for grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations, and for related administrative costs. At least 50 percent of the funds shall be available for grants to local public agencies and districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.339.
